Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Tennessee Real Estate Commission

62-13-201. Creation — Members.

There is created the Tennessee real estate commission, referred to in this part as the “commission,” which consists of nine (9) members appointed by the governor, each of whom shall be a resident of this state and shall possess good moral character.

Seven (7) of the members shall each have been principally engaged as a licensed broker or affiliate broker in this state for at least five (5) years prior to the date of the member's appointment and shall be of recognized business standing.

Each of the remaining two (2) members of the commission shall be a person who is not engaged in or conducting the business or acting in the capacity of a real estate broker or affiliate broker, nor shall the two (2) remaining members be engaged in the business of real estate financing or development.

Every member of the commission shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years and shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualifies by subscribing to the constitutional oath of office, which shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Any vacancy occurring on the commission shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

No members shall be appointed to succeed themselves for more than one (1) full term.

The governor may remove any member of the commission for misconduct, incompetency or willful neglect of duty.

Three (3) members shall be appointed from the eastern grand division, three (3) members shall be appointed from the middle grand division and three (3) members shall be appointed from the western grand division. No more than one (1) of the members appointed pursuant to subsection (c) shall reside in the same grand division. No more than three (3) of the members appointed pursuant to subsection (b) shall reside in the same grand division.

In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 7(a)-(e); 1980, ch. 870, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-1309; Acts 1984, ch. 676, § 9; 1988, ch. 1013, § 31; 1993, ch. 172, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. The real estate commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-245.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration, see §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

Acts 1993, ch. 172, § 4 provided that the persons appointed to fill the positions created by the amendment by this act to subsection (a) shall be appointed from the middle grand division, and that the allocation of appointments pursuant to the amendment to subsection (d) shall commence with the expiration of the term of vacancy in office which first occurs after April 13, 1993.

Cross-References. Discriminatory housing practices, title 4, ch. 21, part 6.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch.1, part 2.

Per diem and travel expenses of members, § 56-1-307.

Real estate appraisers, title 62, ch. 39.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

62-13-202. Commission a judicial body — Civil liability.

The commission is declared to be a judicial body and the members or its employees are granted immunity from any civil liability when acting in good faith in the performance of their duties under this chapter.

Should litigation be filed against members of the commission arising from the performance of their duties under this chapter, the commissioners shall be defended by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 16(c); T.C.A., § 62-1310.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Brokers, § 6.

62-13-203. Organization — Powers.

Upon qualification of the members appointed, the commission shall organize itself by selecting from its members a chair and a vice chair and shall have the power to do all things necessary and proper for carrying out this chapter not inconsistent with the laws of this state. The commission may promulgate and adopt bylaws, rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary for such purpose. The promulgation and adoption of rules and regulations authorized by this section shall be pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commission's rules and regulations may incorporate and establish canons of ethics and minimum acceptable standards of practice for licensees.

Each member of the commission shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor before entering upon the discharge of the duties of office.

The commission or any committee of the commission shall be entitled to the services of the attorney general and reporter or the legal department of this state in connection with the affairs of the commission.

The commission may prefer a complaint for violation of this chapter before any court of competent jurisdiction, and it may take the necessary legal steps through the proper legal officer of the state to enforce this chapter and collect the penalties provided in this chapter.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 7(b), (c); 1981, ch. 473, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-1311; Acts 1987, ch. 419, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Representation by attorney general and reporter, § 8-6-301.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee real estate commission education course approval. OAG 10-09, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/26/10).

Real estate commission rulemaking authority for vacation lodging services. OAG 12-24, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/28/12).

62-13-204. Regulation of fees or commissions.

Nothing in this chapter shall allow the commission to set fees or commissions for real estate contracts or transactions; and if the practice is found to be in actual practice in the field, if because of action of the commission, all members of the commission shall forfeit their licenses.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 21; T.C.A., § 62-1312.

62-13-205. Record of proceedings — Seal.

The commission shall keep a record of its proceedings and shall adopt a seal of such design as it shall prescribe for the certification of the record.

The executive director shall have custody and charge of the seal.

Copies of all records and papers in the office of the commission, duly certified and authenticated by its seal, shall be received in evidence in all courts with like effect as the original.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 7(f); T.C.A., § 62-1313.

62-13-206. Meetings.

The commission may hold meetings it may deem necessary for the purpose of transacting business that may properly come before it. All members of the commission shall be duly notified of the time and place of each meeting.

A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum at any meeting of the commission.

The commission shall hold at least one (1) meeting annually in each grand division of the state.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 7(g); 1981, ch. 473, § 5; T.C.A., § 62-1314; Acts 2007, ch. 572, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 572, § 2 provided that any expense incurred by the commission as a result of implementation of the provisions of the act, which added subsection (c), shall be allocated from the real estate education and recovery account.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

62-13-207. Executive director — Director of education — Qualifications.

The commission shall have an executive director, who shall have passed the broker's examination for this state. The commission shall set all other qualifications necessary for the position of executive director. The executive director shall be appointed by the commission, with the approval of the commissioner of personnel. The term of the executive director shall be four (4) years, and the executive director shall be eligible for reappointment. The commission shall also retain an administrator and other staff members that the commission may deem necessary and proper. The commission shall fix the compensation to be paid to the executive director, the administrator and staff of the commission, subject to applicable rules, regulations and law.

The commission shall have a full-time director of education. The director of education shall have a college degree from an accredited university.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 7(d); 1975, ch. 165, § 11; 1978, ch. 906, § 23; T.C.A., § 62-1315; Acts 1993, ch. 293, § 1; 1994, ch. 702, § 1.

62-13-208. Real estate education and recovery account.

There is established within the general fund a real estate education and recovery account, referred to as the “account” in this section. All funds received by the commission under this section shall be deposited into the account and held solely for the purposes of this section. The commission shall maintain a minimum balance of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the account.

Moneys within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-603 for the sole benefit of the account.

When any individual applies for an original license as a broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson, the applicant shall pay, in addition to the original license fee, a fee in an amount established by the commission for deposit into the account. If the commission refuses to issue a license, this fee shall be returned to the applicant.

In addition, the commission may assess each individual broker, affiliate broker and time-share salesperson, as a condition for renewal of the individual's license, a fee, in addition to the renewal fee, not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00), for the purpose of ensuring that the required minimum balance is maintained in the account.

Any person may, by order of any court having competent jurisdiction, recover from the account actual or compensatory damages, not including interest and costs, resulting from any violation of this chapter or of any rule promulgated under this chapter committed by a broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson; provided, that:

The liability of the account shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per transaction, regardless of the number of persons aggrieved or parcels of real estate involved in the transaction;

The liability of the account for the acts of a broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson, when acting as a broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson, shall be terminated upon the issuance of court orders authorizing payments from the account for judgments, or any unsatisfied portion of judgments, in an aggregate amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) on behalf of the broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson;

A broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson acting as an agent in a real estate transaction shall have no claim against the account; and

A bonding company not acting as a principal in a real estate transaction shall have no claim against the account.

When any aggrieved person commences action for a judgment that may result in collection from the account, the person shall promptly notify the commission to this effect in writing, by certified mail, return receipt requested. The commission may, subject to the approval of the attorney general and reporter, take any action it may deem appropriate to protect the integrity of the account.

When any aggrieved person obtains a valid judgment respecting which recourse against the account is permitted under this section, upon termination of all proceedings including reviews and appeals in connection with the judgment and all or any part of the judgment is unpaid after sixty (60) days, and the person has exhausted all remedies at law, including, but not limited to, attachment, execution, levy and garnishment, to satisfy the judgment, the person may apply to the court in which the judgment was entered for an order directing payment from the account of the amount unpaid upon the judgment. Upon determination of the court that the judgment or any part of the judgment is unpaid and all required attempts to secure satisfaction have been made, the court shall enter an order directing the commission to make payment from the account to satisfy the judgment.

If the commission, pursuant to a court order, pays any amount from the account on behalf of a licensed broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson, the license of the broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson may, in the discretion of the commission, be suspended or revoked. No broker, affiliate broker or time-share salesperson whose license is revoked under this subsection (g) shall be eligible to apply for a new license until that person has repaid in full the amount paid from the account on that person's behalf, plus interest at the effective earnings rate for the account for the period the claim is unpaid.

When, upon the order of the court, the commission has paid from the account any sum to the judgment creditor, the commission shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the judgment creditor in the judgment. Any amount recovered by the commission on the judgment shall be deposited to the account. If the total amount collected on the judgment by the commission exceeds the amount paid from the account to the original judgment creditor plus interest and the cost of collection, the commission may elect to pay such coverage or reassign the remaining interest in the judgment to the original judgment creditor. The payment or reassignment to the original judgment creditor shall not subject the account to further liability for payment to the original judgment creditor based on that transaction or judgment. Any costs incurred by the commission in attempting to collect judgments shall be paid from the account.

If, at any time, the money deposited in the account is insufficient to satisfy any duly authorized claim or portion of the claim, the commission shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the account, satisfy the unpaid claims or portions of the unpaid claims in the order that they were originally filed, plus interest at the effective earnings rate for the account for the period the claim is unpaid.

The failure of an aggrieved person to comply with all of the provisions of this section shall constitute a waiver of any rights under this section.

It is unlawful for any person to file or cause to be filed with the commission any notice, statement or other document required under this section that is false or contains any material misstatement of fact.

The commission may, in its discretion, utilize any return on investment of the account to cover expenses incurred in the performance of functions authorized by §§ 62-13-107 and 62-13-108 or in the preparation and dissemination of information for the benefit of licensees; provided, that the commission shall not expend or commit sums for any such purpose in an amount that would reduce the account to a balance of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

No state funds shall be expended to effectuate this section other than the fees and charges set forth in this section.

Acts 1973, ch. 181, § 11(b), (c); modified; Acts 1978, ch. 906, § 24; T.C.A., § 62-1322; Acts 1984, ch. 810, § 6; 1989, ch. 89, § 6; 1989, ch. 324, § 2; 1990, ch. 946, §§ 1-4.

62-13-209. General counsel.

The commission shall have a full time general counsel. The general counsel shall be a graduate of an accredited law school and admitted to practice law in this state.

Acts 1994, ch. 595, § 2.